Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.525

Distribution from conservatorship estate.

Except as otherwise provided in RCW 11.130.435 or qualified or limited in the court's order of appointment and stated in the letters of office, and unless contrary to a conservator's plan under RCW 11.130.510, the conservator may expend or distribute income or principal of the conservatorship estate without specific court authorization or confirmation for the support, care, education, health, or welfare of the individual subject to conservatorship or an individual who is in fact dependent on the individual subject to conservatorship, including the payment of child or spousal support, in accordance with the following rules:

(1) The conservator shall consider a recommendation relating to the appropriate standard of support, care, education, health, or welfare for the individual subject to conservatorship or individual who is dependent on the individual subject to conservatorship, made by a guardian for the individual subject to conservatorship, if any, and, if the individual subject to conservatorship is a minor, a recommendation made by a parent of the minor.

(2) The conservator acting in compliance with the conservator's duties under RCW 11.130.505 is not liable for an expenditure or distribution made based on a recommendation under subsection (1) of this section unless the conservator knows the expenditure or distribution is not in the best interest of the individual subject to conservatorship.

(3) In making an expenditure or distribution under this section, the conservator shall consider:

(a) The size of the conservatorship estate, the estimated duration of the conservatorship, and the likelihood the individual subject to conservatorship, at some future time, may be fully self-sufficient and able to manage the individual's financial affairs and the conservatorship estate;

(b) The accustomed standard of living of the individual subject to conservatorship and individual who is dependent on the individual subject to conservatorship;

(c) Other funds or source used for the support of the individual subject to conservatorship; and

(d) The preferences, values, and prior directions of the individual subject to conservatorship.

(4) Funds expended or distributed under this section may be paid by the conservator to any person, including the individual subject to conservatorship, as reimbursement for expenditures the conservator might have made, or in advance for services to be provided to the individual subject to conservatorship or individual who is dependent on the individual subject to conservatorship if it is reasonable to expect the services will be performed and advance payment is customary or reasonably necessary under the circumstances.

[ 2019 c 437 s 422.]